Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-2803
Health care provider, defined.

Health care provider means: (1) A physician; (2) a certified registered nurse anesthetist; (3) an individual, partnership, limited liability company, corporation, association, facility, institution, or other entity authorized by law to provide professional medical services by physicians or certified registered nurse anesthetists; (4) a hospital; or (5) a personal representative as defined in section 30-2209 who is successor or assignee of any health care provider designated in subdivisions (1) through (4) of this section.

Laws 1976, LB 434, § 3;

Laws 1993, LB 121, § 245;

Laws 1995, LB 563, § 1;

Laws 2005, LB 256, § 17.